sv: Klockljud: Klämta; Ding; Ding-dong; Övrigt
es: Sonido del timbre: Campana; Timbre; Din don; Otros
sk-SK: Zvuk zvončeka: Zvonkohra; Ding; Ding-dong; Iné
ja: ベルの音: チャイム; チーン; ピンポン; その他
pl: Dźwięk dzwonka: Kurant; Ding; Ding-dong; Inne
nb: Bjellelyd: Klokkespill; Ding; Ding-dong; Annet
sl-SI: Zvok zvona: Zvonenje; Ding; Ding-dong; Drugo
zh-CN: 铃声: 编钟; 叮当声; 叮咚; 其他
hr-HR: Zvuk zvona: Zvon; Ding; Din-don; Ostalo
el: Ήχος κουδουνιού: Μελωδικό κουδούνι; Κουδούνισμα; Ντινγκ ντονγκ; Άλλο
pt-BR: Som do sino: Buzina; Ding; Ding-dong; Outro
fi: Kellon ääni: Kello; Ding; Ding-dong; Muu
vi: Âm thanh chuông: Kêu vang; Binh; Binh boong; Khác
bg-BG: Звук на звънец: Звънец; Динг; Динг-донг; Други
hu: Harang hangja: Harangjáték; Bim; Bim-bam; Egyéb
zh-TW: 鈴聲: 門鈴音樂; 叮; 叮咚; 其他
de: Glockenklang: Melodie; Ding; Ding-Dong; Sonstiges
ru: Звук звонка: Перезвон; Звон; Дин-дон; Другое
nl: Belgeluid: Klok; Ding; Ding Dong; Andere
ko: 벨 소리: 차임벨; 땡; 딩동; 기타
fr: Son de la cloche: Carillon; Ding; Ding-dong; Autre
it: Suono del campanello: Carillon; Ding; Ding-dong; Altro
da: Klokkelyd: Klokkespil; Ding; Ding-dong; Andet
pt-PT: Som da campainha: Chime; Ding; Ding-dong; Outro
lt-LT: Varpelio garsas: Varpelis; Ding; Ding-dong; Kita
en: Bell sound: Chime; Ding; Ding-dong; Other
th: เสียงกระดิ่ง: ระฆัง; ติ๊ง; ดิ๊ง ด่อง; อื่นๆ
cs: Zvuk zvonku: Cinkání; Zvonění; Ding-dong; Jiné
ro-RO: Sunet clopoțelul: Melodie; Ding; Ding-dong; Altele
tr: Zil Sesi: Zil; Ding; Ding-dong; Diğer